Montana, session 2025, HB871.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 7-13-4312, MCA, is amended to read:
"7-13-4312. Authorization to furnish water and sewer services to persons located outside
municipality -- prohibition. (1) A city council that owns and operates a municipal water system, a municipal
sewer system, or both, to furnish water and sewer services to the inhabitants of a city as a public utility may
furnish water from the water system and sewage services from the sewer system to the inhabitants or to any
person, factory, industry, or producer of farm or other products located outside of the corporate limits of the city
at reasonable rates filed by the city or town council. The city council may make collections to provide water and
sewer services in the same manner as collections are made within the corporate limits.
(2) The city council may not require that a parcel of land located outside of the corporate limits of
the city change from single family zoning to multifamily zoning BE DEVELOPED AT A HIGHER DENSITY THAN ALLOWED
UNDER EXISTING COUNTY ZONING REGULATIONS COVERING THE PARCEL in order to connect to a municipal water
system or a municipal sewer system."

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $1,000 from the general fund to
the department of environmental quality for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, to update documents related
to municipal water and sewer systems.

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 871

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB0871.2
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 871